bibisco/dictionaries/es_MX/es_MX.dic
abanicar/PRSTVWX
abdicar/HPSVWX
abolir/HQTVWX
abrigar/IPRSTVWX
absolver/IOQRTUWY
acabañar/PSVWX
acampar/PSVWX
acarrear/IPSVWX
acerar/HPSVWX
achinar/PSVWX
aclimatar/HPRSTVWX
aconchar/PSVWX
acostar/IPRSTWX
actualizar/HPRSTUVWX
acurrullar/PSVWX
adiestrar/IPRSTVWX
adormir/IVY
adquirir/LOQRTWX
adscribir/OQRTVWY
advenir/IWY
advertir/INOQWYZ
afluir/WY
afollar/PSWX
agorar/PSWX
ahorquillar/PRSTVWX
alborear/PSVWX
alforrochar/PSVWX
alotar/PSVWX
amalladar/PSVWX
amenorgar/PSVWX
ampliar/HPRSTUWX
anihilar/HIPSVWX
anteponer/WY
apalear/IPSVWX
apelmazar/PSVWX
aporracear/PSVWX
aquilatar/IPSVWX
argüir/WY
arralar/PSVWX
arrepentir/IOWY
arruchar/PSTVWX
asilar/PSVWX
ataludar/PSVWX
atolladar/PSVWX
atribuir/OQWYZ
aturrullar/PRSTVWX
aviar/HIPSWX
babear/PSVWX
banquetear/PSVWX
basquear/PSVWX
bienvivir/VWX
bombardear/PRSTVWX
brincar/PSVWX
cabalar/PSVWX
caer/IOWY
calcar/PSTVWX
candiletear/PSVWX
carburar/HLPSVWX
catequizar/LPSVWX
ceñir/OQWYZ
cercear/PSVWX
chapuzar/PSVWX
chistar/PSVWX
circunvalar/HPSVWX
cocear/IPSVWX
comadrear/PSVWX
componer/OQRTUWY
compulsar/HPSVWX
concebir/IOQWY
concluir/OQWYZ
conferir/QWY
confiar/PRSTWX
confluir/WY
consentir/IOQWYZ
conservar/HLPRSTUVWX
constituir/OQWY
contraatacar/PSVWX
contrahacer/OQRTWY
contravenir/WY
contribuir/WY
convenir/LOWY
converger/VWX
convertir/OQWYZ
corregir/IOQWYZ
corretear/PSVWX
corroer/VY
cristianizar/HPSVWX
culear/PSVWX
decantar/HPRSVWX
decir/OQWYZ
deferir/WY
delatar/PSVWX
deponer/WY
depositar/PRSTVWX
derruir/WY
desacotar/PSVWX
desadvertir/IWY
desalentar/PRSWX
desapartar/PRSTUVWX
desastillar/PSTVWX
desbaraustar/PSVWX
descalcificar/HPRSTVWX
descarriar/IPRSWX
desceñir/WY
descobijar/PRSTVWX
desconsentir/WY
describir/OQRTUVWY
descuartizar/IPSVWX
desembolsar/PSVWX
desencabestrar/PSVWX
desencrespar/PRSTVWX
desenmascarar/PRSTVWX
desenvolver/IOQRTUWY
desflemar/PSVWX
deshabilitar/PSVWX
desigualar/PSVWX
desleír/OQVWY
desliñar/PSVWX
desmechar/PSTVWX
desnudar/IPRSTVWX
desobstruir/QWY
despachar/PRSTVWX
despeñar/IPRSTVWX
despedir/IOQWY
despintar/PSVWX
despulsar/IPSVWX
destechar/PSVWX
destituir/OQWY
desucar/HPSVWX
desvestir/OQWY
desyemar/PSVWX
devolver/OQRTUWY
diezmar/PSVWX
diferir/QWY
diluir/OQWY
disconvenir/LWY
discordar/PSWX
distender/OQRTWX
distinguir/OQRTUVWXYZ
distribuir/OQWYZ
divertir/IOQWY
dragonear/PSVWX
efluir/WY
ejercitar/HLPRSTVWX
elegir/OQWYZ
embardar/PSVWX
embestir/QWY
embolicar/PSVWX
embrisar/PSVWX
empapirotar/PSVWX
empequeñecer/IWX
empopar/PSVWX
enanzar/PSVWX
encallar/PSVWX
encapirotar/PSVWX
encastrar/PSVWX
enchufar/PSTVWX
encorajar/PSVWX
endeudar/IPRSVWX
enfoscar/PSVWX
engargantar/PSVWX
engredar/PSVWX
enjambrar/PSVWX
enlomar/PRSVWX
enojar/PRSTVWX
enrojecer/IOQRTWX
ensobear/PSVWX
entintar/PRSTVWX
entreabrir/VWXY
entredecir/WY
entremezclar/PSTVWX
entumir/VWX
enviscar/IPSVWX
envolver/IOQRTUWY
erguir/IOQRTXY
esbozar/PSVWX
escampar/PSVWX
escarzar/PSVWX
escribir/LOQRTUVWXY
esguardamillar/PSVWX
espejar/PSVWX
espumajear/PSVWX
estaquillar/PSTVWX
estatuir/QWY
estrangular/HIPRSTUVWX
estreñir/IVY
europeizar/PSWX
excluir/OQWYZ
expandir/OQRTUVWX
expedir/HLOQWYZ
exponer/OQRTWY
extinguir/OQRTUVWXY
extraer/OQWY
fandanguear/PSVWX
fichar/PRSTUVWX
florecer/ILWX
fluir/WY
fracturar/PRSTUVWX
freír/OQVWY
fumar/LPRSTUVWX
garbear/PSVWX
gemir/WY
glasear/PRSTUVWX
granjear/PRSTVWX
guisar/LPSTVWX
hacer/ILOQRTUWY
haronear/PSVWX
henchir/IWY
hendir/IVXY
herrar/PSWX
hervir/VY
hojear/PSTVWX
huchear/PSVWX
huir/WY
ilimitar/NPSVWX
imbuir/QWY
imponer/OQRTUWY
improvisar/HNPSTVWX
incluir/OQWYZ
incumplir/IVWX
inferir/QWY
infringir/QTVWX
injerir/OQWY
inscribir/OQRTUVWY
inseminar/HPSTVWX
instruir/OQWY
interconectar/PRSTUVWX
interponer/OQRTUWY
intuir/HQWY
invertir/QWY
investir/QWY
involucrar/PRSVWX
jarapotear/PSVWX
julepear/PSVWX
laicizar/HPSVWX
lavar/HIPRSTVWX
leer/OQWYZ
librear/PSVWX
llapar/PSVWX
luxar/HPRSTVWX
malcasar/PSVWX
malherir/Y
maltraer/QWY
mamullar/PSVWX
manuscribir/VWXY
marrullar/PSVWX
mazonear/PSVWX
medir/HOQWYZ
mentir/OWY
merar/PSVWX
microprogramar/HPSTVWX
mocear/PSVWX
monedear/PSVWX
morir/OWY
mostrar/HPRSTUWX
municipalizar/HPSVWX
negrear/PSVWX
oír/OQVWY
obstruir/OQWYZ
ocluir/OQWYZ
olear/PSVWX
oponer/ORWY
organizar/HPRSTUVWX
paginar/HPSVWX
pantallear/PSTVWX
parlotear/PSVWX
pautar/PSVWX
perchar/PSVWX
permutar/HPSVWX
pervertir/IOQWY
petrolear/PSTVWX
pipar/PSVWX
planificar/HPRSTUVWX
poder/OQSWYZ
polemizar/PSVWX
poner/ILOQRTUWY
portazgar/PSVWX
poseer/OQWY
posponer/QTWY
preconcebir/WY
predefinir/HVWX
predisponer/OQRTWY
preelegir/WY
preferir/IOQWY
preponer/WY
presentir/IQWY
preservar/HPRSTVWX
presuponer/QTWY
procurar/HPRSTVWX
proferir/WY
proponer/OQRTUWY
proscribir/VWXY
proseguir/IOQWY
prostituir/OQWY
punir/HVWX
quinolear/PSVWX
raer/IWY
ramalear/PSVWX
rarefacer/WY
rastrallar/PSVWX
reír/OQVWY
reabrir/OQRTVWY
reanimar/HPRSTVWX
reargüir/WY
rebordear/PSVWX
recaer/WY
recatear/PSVWX
reclinar/HPRSTVWX
recomponer/QTWY
reconstituir/OQWY
recontar/IPSWX
reconvertir/WY
recubrir/IQTVWY
redescubrir/IVWY
reelegir/OQWYZ
reexaminar/PSVWX
referir/OQWY
regalar/IPRSTUVWX
rehervir/VY
rehoyar/PSVWX
rehuir/OQWY
relanzar/PSVWX
releer/OQWYZ
remirar/PSVWX
reobrar/PSVWX
repetir/HNOQWYZ
replegar/PRSTWX
reponer/OQRTWY
requerir/ILOQWY
resalir/WX
resentir/IOWY
resolver/OQRTUWY
resonar/HLPSWX
restituir/OQWY
resumir/NOQRTUVWX
reteñir/WY
retozar/PSVWX
retraer/IOQWY
retrotraer/OQWY
revacunar/HPSVWX
revenir/IWY
revertir/VWXY
revestir/IOQWY
revolver/IOQRTWY
revotar/PRSVWX
romanear/PSVWX
ruchar/PSVWX
sacralizar/HPSTVWX
saludar/HPRSTVWX
secretear/PSVWX
sentir/INOQWY
serpear/PSVWX
sincronizar/HPRSTVWX
sobrebarrer/VWX
sobreescribir/OQRTUVWY
sobreponer/OQRTWY
sobresanar/PSVWX
sobrescribir/VWY
sobrevenir/WY
sofreír/VWY
solazar/PRSTVWX
sonetizar/PSVWX
sonreír/VWY
soslayar/PSTVWX
subscribir/VWXY
substituir/WY
substraer/WY
subvertir/WY
sucintar/PRSVWX
superponer/OQRTWY
suponer/OQRTWY
surgir/IVWX
suscribir/OQRTUVWY
talar/LPSVWX
tartalear/PSVWX
tembliquear/PSVWX
texturizar/PSTVWX
titularizar/HPSTVWX
trabajar/LPSTVWX
traer/OQWYZ
transcribir/QTVWY
transcurrir/VWX
transferir/OQWYZ
transponer/QTWY
trapazar/PSVWX
trascribir/QTVWXY
trasmigrar/HPSVWX
trasponer/OQRTWY
trasuntar/PSVWX
tribuir/WY
tripartir/HVWX
trotar/PSVWX
turrar/PSVWX
utilizar/HPRSTUVWX
vapulear/IPRSTVWX
venir/RWY
verberar/HPSVWX
vestir/OQWY
vindicar/HPSVWX
voltejear/PSVWX
zaherir/QWY
zanganear/PSVWX
zonificar/HPSTVWX
